Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.031

Purpose and powers.

(1) A limited liability company may be formed under this chapter for any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

(2) Unless this chapter, its certificate of formation, or its limited liability company agreement provides otherwise, a limited liability company has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities.

[ 2015 c 188 s 8.]